Vermont, session 2025-2026, H308.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 9706(y) is amended to read:
(y) The statutory purpose of the exemption for sales of building materials
and supplies in subdivision 9741(39) of this title is to provide incentives to
restore and revitalize downtown districts reduce the cost of construction in
Vermont.
VT LEG #380249 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.308
2025 Page 2 of 4
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. § 9741 is amended to read:
§ 9741. SALES NOT COVERED
Retail sales and use of the following shall be exempt from the tax on retail
sales imposed under section 9771 of this title and the use tax imposed under
section 9773 of this title:
* * *
(39) Sales of building materials within any three consecutive years in
excess of $1,000,000.00 in purchase value used in the construction, renovation,
or expansion of facilities that are used exclusively, except for isolated or
occasional uses, for the manufacture of tangible personal property for sale and
supplies. As used in this subdivision, “building materials and supplies”
include all materials and supplies consumed, employed, or expended in the
construction, reconstruction, alteration, remodeling, or repair of any building
or structure, as well as the materials and supplies physically incorporated
therein. Blueprints are not considered supplies for purposes of the exemption
under this subdivision.
* * *
Sec. 3. 32 V.S.A. § 9706(y) is amended to read:
(y) The statutory purpose of the exemption for sales of building materials
and supplies in subdivision 9741(39) of this title is to reduce the cost of
VT LEG #380249 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.308
2025 Page 3 of 4
construction in Vermont provide incentives to restore and revitalize downtown
districts.
Sec. 4. 32 V.S.A. § 9741 is amended to read:
§ 9741. SALES NOT COVERED
Retail sales and use of the following shall be exempt from the tax on retail
sales imposed under section 9771 of this title and the use tax imposed under
section 9773 of this title:
* * *
(39) Sales of building materials and supplies. As used in this
subdivision, “building materials and supplies” include all materials and
supplies consumed, employed, or expended in the construction, reconstruction,
alteration, remodeling, or repair of any building or structure, as well as the
materials and supplies physically incorporated therein. Blueprints are not
considered supplies for purposes of the exemption under this subdivision
within any three consecutive years in excess of $1,000,000.00 in purchase
value used in the construction, renovation, or expansion of facilities that are
used exclusively, except for isolated or occasional uses, for the manufacture of
tangible personal property for sale.
* * *
VT LEG #380249 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.308
2025 Page 4 of 4
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section and Secs. 1 (statutory purpose) and 2 (building materials
and supplies exemption) shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
(b) Secs. 3 (statutory purpose) and 4 (reversion to previous exemption)
shall take effect on July 1, 2028.
VT LEG #380249 v.1